Utah statutes.
13-25a-111.   Exemptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Sections 13-25a-103 and 13-25a-108 do not apply to:

(1)  a telephone call made for a charitable purpose as defined in Section 13-22-2;

(2)  a charitable solicitation as defined in Section 13-22-2; or

(3)  a person who holds a license or registration:

(a)  under Title 31A, Insurance Code;

(b)  issued by the Division of Real Estate established in Section 61-2-201; or

(c)   issued by the National Association of Securities Dealers.



Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

